Hawaii statutes.
§421J-15 Service of process. The board
shall establish a policy to provide reasonable access to persons authorized to
serve civil process in compliance with section 634-21.5. [L 2009, c 158, §§2, 8;
am L 2011, c 65, §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next